Utah statutes.
13-1a-2.   Director to supervise division -- Appointment.

The division shall be under the supervision, direction, and control of a director.  The director shall be appointed by the executive director of the Department of Commerce with the approval of the governor.  The director shall hold office at the pleasure of the governor.

